Missouri, session 2026, HB2301.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 130.170, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 130.170, to read as follows:
130.170. For purposes of sections 130.170 to 130.188, the following terms mean:
(1) "Committee", the same meaning as otherwise provided in section 130.011, except
it shall not include candidate committees or continuing committees, provided that if a
continuing committee makes an expenditure that is subject to subsection 3 of section
130.176 or makes a contribution to a committee that has made an expenditure that is
subject to subsection 3 of section 130.716, that continuing committee shall be considered
a committee for the purposes of sections 130.170 to 130.188;
(2) "Directly or indirectly", acting either alone or jointly with, through, or on behalf
of any other committee, organization, person, or other entity;
(3) "Foreign national", any of the following:
(a) An individual who is not a citizen or lawful permanent resident of the United
States of America;
(b) A government, or subdivision, of a foreign country or municipality thereof;
(c) A foreign political party;
(d) Any entity, such as a partnership, association, corporation, organization, or other
combination of persons, that is organized under the laws of, or has its principal place of
business in, a foreign country; or
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2301 2
(e) Any entity organized pursuant to the laws of the United States of America or any
state thereof that is wholly or majority owned by a person or entity described in paragraphs
(a) to (d) of this subdivision, unless:
a. Any contribution or expenditure it makes derives entirely from funds generated by
the entity's United States operations; and
b. All decisions concerning the contribution or expenditure are made by individuals
who are United States citizens or lawful permanent residents, except for setting overall budget
amounts;
(4) "Funds obtained through the usual course of business", funds generated entirely
by the entity's United States operations;
(5) "Lobbyist", the same meaning as in section 105.470;
(6) "Prohibited sources", contributions from or expenditures by a foreign national
made with the intent to use such funds to influence an election on a ballot measure;
(7) "Preliminary activity", includes, but is not limited to, conducting a poll, drafting
ballot measure language, conducting a focus group, making telephone calls, and travel;
(8) "Tax-exempt organization", an organization that is described in Section 501(c) of
the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 and is exempt from taxation under Section 501(a) of such
code. A political organization organized pursuant to Section 527 of such code shall not be
considered a tax-exempt organization.
✔